District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.34

Persons required to deposit proof of future responsibility.

The provisions of this chapter requiring the deposit of proof of financial responsibility for the future, subject to certain exemptions, shall apply with respect to persons who have been convicted of or forfeited bail for certain offenses under motor vehicle laws or who have failed to pay judgments upon causes of action arising out of ownership, maintenance, or use of vehicles of a type subject to registration under the laws of the District of Columbia.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 129, ch. 222, § 34

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-434.
1973 Ed., § 40-450.